inc/flattened/otw.lexc
LEXICON VTI_INDEP_NEG 
+Neg:sii    VTI_INDEP_PERS_GET ; !zii after nasal
            VTI_INDEP_PERS_GET ;

!{Number slot 
LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PERS_GET
@R.Person@  VTI_INDEP_NUM ;
@D.Person@  VTI_INDEP_OBV ;

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_OBV
+3+4:iniw           VTI_INDEP_PRE_MODE ; !out on limb by allowing continuation
+3+4+Prt+Dub:inigoban2  # ; 
                        !inan pl number tricky here, because never indexed in conjunct/conjunct derived forms

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_NUM
+%0:n           VTI_INDEP_PRE_MODE ;
@D.Person.3@    VTI_INDEP_1_OR_2_NUM ;
@D.Person.1@    VTI_INDEP_3_OR_2_NUM ;
@R.Person.3@    VTI_INDEP_PRT_DUB ;
!passive unknown

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_1_OR_2_NUM
+1+Pl:naan2y1    VTI_INDEP_PRE_PERIPH ; !naan unattested w/ mode, but may end word
+1+Pl:min2       VTI_INDEP_PRE_MODE ; !21pl assumed to be compatible with this too

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_3_OR_2_NUM
+2+Pl:naawaa    VTI_INDEP_2PL_PRE_MODE ; !3pl doesn't have dedicated morpheme, rides on 2pl
!} Num end

!{Mode slot 
LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PRE_MODE
0:aa    VTI_INDEP_MODE ;
        VTI_INDEP_PERIPH ;
        # ;         

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_2PL_PRE_MODE
        VTI_INDEP_MODE ;
        VTI_INDEP_PERIPH ;
        # ;         

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_MODE
+Dub:dig    VTI_INDEP_DUB_PRE_PERIPH ; 
+Prt:ban2i1  VTI_INDEP_PRT_PRE_PERIPH ; 

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_DUB_PRE_PERIPH 
0:en        VTI_INDEP_PERIPH ;
            # ;

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PRT_PRE_PERIPH 
        VTI_INDEP_PERIPH ;
            # ;

!PrtDub restricted to third persons above
!no inanimate plural information possible (conjuncty suffixes never do)
LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PRT_DUB
+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:%>gwaaban2 # ; !suspiciously non-prt-dub like g-2pl-ban
+Prt+Dub:%>goban2 # ;

!}Mode end

!might consider restricting plural morphology a little:
    !min (1pl) can't be directly followed by pl (though can be followed at distance)
    !ini (3obv) may never be followed by pl (hard to tell with sparse information)
LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PRE_PERIPH 
        VTI_INDEP_PERIPH  ;
        # ;

LEXICON VTI_INDEP_PERIPH
+%0+Pl:%>an   # ;

!} indep end

!{Conjunct order (careful, this looks just like VAI, but differs in important ways) 
!{negative slot 
LEXICON VTI_CNJ_NEG 
+Neg:%>siiw3        VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET ; !must be followed by dub in vtis
+Neg:%>siw3         VTI_CNJ_PRT_SET ; !may only be followed by prt in vtis
                VTI_CNJ_PERSNUM ;
+Neg+3+Pl:%>si%>gwaa  VTI_CNJ_IRREG_3PL_SUFFS ; !may be followed by prt in vtis

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_IRREG_3PL_SUFFS 
    # ;
    VTI_CNJ_PRT ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET 
@P.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_PERSNUM ; 

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PRT_SET 
@P.Mode.Prt@    VTI_CNJ_PERSNUM ; 
!}

!{ persnum 

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PERSNUM
    VTI_CNJ_3 ;
    VTI_CNJ_3PL_MODE_GET ;
    VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_A ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_A
0:w4    VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET_A ;
        VTI_CNJ_NOT_3 ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET_A
!@P.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_NOT_3 ;
@U.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_NOT_3 ; !U won't overwrite prior Prt, Prt fails instead

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_NOT_3
+1:%>aan       VTI_CNJ_PRT_1 ; !breaking morpheme over continuation lexica. have pret cnj "b" trigger assimilation, sometimes nasalize V
+2:%>an        VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ; !ditto re assimilation: are there cases were nas-obs isn't modified to be homorganic?
+1+Pl:%>aang      VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ;
+2+1+Pl:%>ang         VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ; !VTI never shows w/o for mode suffs
+2+Pl:%>eg       VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ; !VTI only shows w for DUB, not PRT DUB
@R.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_DUB_UNSPEC_ACT ; !irregular realization for unspec act dub

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_UNSPEC_ACT
+X:%>iing       VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_3PL_MODE_GET
@D.Mode.Prt@ VTI_CNJ_3PL ; !neg morpheme siw sets prt as legal follower, but 3pl neg prt doesn't use siw 
            VTI_CNJ_3 ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_3PL
+3+Pl:%>waad1       VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_B ; !Irregularity when negated and this is last morpheme/followed by prt

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_3 
+3:%>d1               VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_B ; !d1 phon in root.lexc
+3+4:%>nid1           VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_B ; !nas morph inid?
+X:%>nd1              VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ; !nd1b -> ngib, this realization only compatible with prt, not dub

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_B !letters or numbers for ordered? 
0:w4    VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET_B ;
        VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_SET_B
@U.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET ; !U won't overwrite prior Prt

!} persnum end

!{preterite slot 
!{first person prt 
LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PRT_1
+Prt:%>b1aan2   VTI_CNJ_DUB_GET_1 ; !Medler could delete this n
@D.Mode@    VTI_CNJ_1_END ; 
@R.Mode.Prt@ VTI_CNJ_1_END ; 
@R.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_DUB ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_GET_1
@D.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_1_END ;
@R.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_DUB ;

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_1_END
!            # ; !Medler didn't nasalize
0:h         # ; !left over morpheme chunk ... first person aan turns to aanh, pret turns to baanh
!} first person prt end

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_MODE_GET
            VTI_CNJ_PRT ;
@D.Mode.Dub@    # ; !may end if Dub wasn't set earlier 

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_PRT 
+Prt:%>b1an2   VTI_CNJ_DUB_GET ; !i1 should be included for participles, but grammar pretty unclear vti participles
@R.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_DUB ;
!@D.Mode@    VTI_CNJ_DUB_GET ;
!@R.Mode@    VTI_CNJ_DUB ; !otherwise, you can end, or pick up +Dub
!unclear why commented out section here behaved differently from  VTI_CNJ_PRT_1

LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB_GET
@D.Mode.Dub@    # ;
@R.Mode.Dub@    VTI_CNJ_DUB ;

!} prt end

!{dubitative slot
LEXICON VTI_CNJ_DUB 
+Dub:%>en2 # ;
!} dub end

!} Cnj end

!{ imperative
LEXICON VTI_IMPER 
+Imm+2:n4 # ; !no lengthening (amn -/> aan)
+Imm+2+Pl:ok # ; !og optionally after vowels?
+Imm+2+1+Pl+%0:daa # ;
+Imm+2+1+Pl+%0+Pl:daanin # ;
+Del+2:%>kan # ; 
+Del+2+Pl:%>keg # ; 
+Del+2+1+Pl+%0:%>kang # ;
+Del+2+1+Pl+%0+Pl:%>kang # ;
+Neg+2:%>ken # ; !gen after nasals
+Neg+2+Pl:%>kegon # ; !gegon after nasals
+Neg+2+1+Pl+%0:siidaa # ; !ziidaa after nasals
+Neg+2+1+Pl+%0+Pl:siidaanin # ; !book gives suff daanin, exe waabndanziidaanin

!} imp end
!} VTI end
LEXICON NOUNS
  NA ;
  NI ;
@R.Person@  NAD ;
@R.Person@  NID ;

LEXICON NA_SET
@P.Animate.1@   NA_TAG ;

LEXICON NA_TAG
+NA:0   N_PRE_INFL ;

LEXICON NAD_SET
@P.Animate.1@   NAD_TAG ;

LEXICON NAD_TAG
+NAD:0   N_PRE_INFL ;

LEXICON NI_SET
@P.Animate.%0@    NI_TAG ;

LEXICON NI_TAG
+NI:0 N_PRE_INFL ;

LEXICON NID_SET
@P.Animate.%0@   NID_TAG ;

LEXICON NID_TAG
+NID:0   N_PRE_INFL ;

LEXICON N_PRE_INFL
    N_CON_DIM ;



!#####
!#Major POS's
!#####

LEXICON VERBS  !this is looking like a gateway, but not so labeled, affixes will need to be edited too
! @D.Person.3@   VAI_GET ; !VAIs never take third person prefix
! @D.Person@      VII_GET ;
!                 VAIO ; 
!                 TRANS_GET ;
! VAI
@D.Person.3@^VERB^                          VAI_TAG ; !VAIs never take third person prefix
@D.Person.3@^VERB_m^:@D.Person.3@^VERB_m^m  VAI_TAG ; !VAIs never take third person prefix
@D.Person.3@^VERB_n^:@D.Person.3@^VERB_n^n  VAI_TAG ; !VAIs never take third person prefix
! VII
@D.Person@^VERB^                            VII_TAG ;
@D.Person@^VERB_d2^:@D.Person@^VERB_d2^d2   VII_TAG ;
@D.Person@^VERB_m^:@D.Person@^VERB_m^m      VII_TAG ;
@D.Person@^VERB_n^:@D.Person@^VERB_n^n      VII_TAG ;
! VAIO
^VERB^                     VAIO_TAG ; 
! VTI
^VERB^                     VTI_TAG ;
^VERB_m1^:^VERB_m1^m1      VTI_TAG ;
^VERB_n1^:^VERB_n1^n1      VTI_TAG ;
^VERB_n^:^VERB_n^n         VTI_TAG ;
! VTA
^VERB^                     VTA_TAG ;
^VERB_n1^:^VERB_n1^n1      VTA_TAG ;
^VERB_s1^:^VERB_s1^s1      VTA_TAG ;
^VERB_m^:^VERB_m^m         VTA_TAG ;
^VERB_n^:^VERB_n^n         VTA_TAG ;

LEXICON VAI_GET
    VAI ;

LEXICON VII_GET
    VII_DEF ; 

LEXICON TRANS_GET
    VTA ; 
!original vta classes
!kept in case this division is useful
!    VTA_DEF ;
!    VTA_AW ;
!    VTA_C ;
!    VTA_CW ;
!    VTA_IZHI ;
!    VTA_S ;
    VTI ;
!original vti class
!    VTI_AM ;

LEXICON VII_TAG
+VII:0   VII_ORDERS_GET ;

LEXICON VAI_TAG
+VAI:0       VAI_ORDERS_GET ;

LEXICON VAIO_TAG
+VAIO:0     VAIO_ORDERS_GET ;

LEXICON VTA_TAG
+VTA:0     VTA_PREORDER_GET ;

LEXICON V_PREVERBS_MANNER
PV/mchi+:michi-    VERBS    " 1 bare, plain, in the basic and simple manner" ; !Rand key:n20114817-49-43n
PV/gnaaj+:gVo1naaj-    VERBS    " 1 beautiful, good-looking, pretty, handsome" ; !Rand key:n73029029776n
PV/niboodwewi+:niboodwewi- VERBS " 1 embarassedly" ;
PV/aana+:X2aana-   VERBS " 1 in vain, to no avail" ; !optional blocker to stop ccnj yaano!Rand key:n72973263339n
PV/maandaa+:mamaandaa-   VERBS    " 1 [see mmaandaa-]" ; !Rand key:n71429179571n
LEXICON NA
wjiik:ojiigw1    NA_SET    " 1 [see jiik]" ; !Rand key:n73072077196n
bemdaabaazhwenh:bemidaabaazhweny    NA_SET    " 1 taxi driver" ; !Rand key:n72976552156n
bebaabgaanh:bebaabVv1gaany    NA_SET    " 1 pancake" ; !Rand key:n72976265968n
boonse:boonise    NA_SET    " 1 chicken hawk" ; !Rand key:n72980954918n
shkiniigkwe:shkiniigikwe    NA_SET    " 1 teenage girl, young woman" ; !Rand key:n73031480001n
LEXICON NAD
ngidik:%^gidigo    NAD_SET    " 1 my knee" ; !Rand key:n73021378064n
ndaan'koobdenh:%^aanikoobideny    NAD_SET    " 1 my great grandchild" ; !Rand key:n72973444896n
ndoozhim:%^doozhim    NAD_SET    " 1 my parallel-nephew" ; !Rand key:n73039843723n
nkeweziinyim:%^keweziinyim    NAD_SET    " 1 my husband, my old man" ; !Rand key:n72974456311n
nooshenh:%^oosheny    NAD_SET    " 1 my grandchild" ; !Rand key:n71435146666n
LEXICON NI
bshanzhe'ganeyaatik:bashanzhehiganeyaatigo   NI_SET    " 1 whipstock" ; !Rand key:n72982139769n
memaangsheyaanh:memaangisheyaany    NI_SET    " 1 a type of basket with two ring handles, big-eared basket" ; !Rand key:n71429561413n
gboobjigan:giboobijigan    NI_SET    " 1 bag [with a drawstring]" ; !Rand key:n73019337185n
naagan:onaagan    NI_SET    " 1 bowl, dish, plate" ; !Rand key:n71430858047n
zhiibaawaamjigan:zhiibaawaabanjigan    NI_SET    " 1 [see zhiibaawaabnjigan]" ; !Rand key:n73035131909n
LEXICON NID
ndooskweyaap:%^dooskweyaabi1    NID_SET    " 1 my bloodvein, my vein" ; !Rand key:n73014479731n
ndazhgan:%^azhigan    NID_SET    " 1 my sock" ; !Rand key:n72974462861n
ngin'gibeshaagan:%^ginigibeshaagan    NID_SET    " 1 my clitoris" ; !Rand key:n73024536267n
nminik:%^minigo    NID_SET    " 1 my testicle" ; !Rand key:n71429739821n
nweyaan:%^weyaan    NID_SET    " 1 my pelt" ; !Rand key:n73071956576n
LEXICON VII_DEF
bkidsin:bakidisin    VII_TAG    " 1 lean over the top of something" ; !Rand2key:n72977565214n
gbojiide:gibojiide    VII_TAG    " 1 be roasted, roast" ; !Rand2key:n73018843428n
kawaatebiisin:akawaatebiisin    VII_TAG    " 1 reflect on the water, cast a shadow on the water" ; !Rand2key:n73017356522n
n'gikwinaagot:nagikawinaagod2   VII_TAG    " 1 look flimsy" ; !Rand key:n73033654998n
zhaabwaazhgaa:zhaabwaazhigaa    VII_TAG    " 1 run through (of water)" ; !Rand2key:n73033432431n
LEXICON VAI
bzagzideshin:bazagizideshin    VAI_TAG    " 1 get something sticky on one's foot, step on something sticky" ; !Rand key:n72981577189n
gyakwendam:goyakwendam    VAI_TAG    " 1 be certain, be sure" ; !Rand key:n73031731514n
napza:inapizVa1    VAI_TAG    " 1 dress in a certain way" ; !Rand key:n73099283562n
zaageyaabooza:zaageyaaboozVa1    VAI_TAG    " 1 float out into view" ; !Rand key:n73036951278n
LEXICON VAIO
debsen:debise    VAIO_TAG    "1 have enough of something, have a sufficient quantity of something" ; !Rand key:n73001434081n
jaagsen:jaagise    VAIO_TAG    "1 run out of something" ; !Rand key:n73028054667n
pabin:apabi    VAIO_TAG    "1 sit on something" ; !Rand key:n73031084451n
zhaagooskmaagen:zhaagooskamaage    VAIO_TAG    "1 beat others to something, get to something before others" ; !Rand key:n2010113021-22-51n
LEXICON VTA
bkizhwaa:bakizhw    VTA_TAG    " 1 cut sth. (an.) (of stringlike objects)" ; !Rand key:n72977642842n
gchitwaawoonaa:gichitwaawoon1    VTA_TAG    " 1 give smb. a great hand [in cards], deal smb. an especially good hand" ; !Rand key:n73019356520n
maajiidwaa:maajiidaw    VTA_TAG    " 1 take something [away] for smb., take something [away] from smb., take something to smb." ; !Rand key:n71429073377n
niisbidmawaa:niisibidamaw    VTA_TAG    " 1 pull something down belonging to smb." ; !Rand key:n73099245513n
